Massachusetts, session 194th, S1678.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 34 of Chapter 135 of the Acts of 2024, is hereby amended by
striking it in its entirety and replacing it with the following:-
Section 122B. No person shall sell ammunition in the commonwealth unless duly
licensed. The chief of police or the board or officer having control of the police in a city or town,
or persons authorized by them, may, after an investigation into the criminal history of the
applicant to determine eligibility to be licensed under this section, grant a license to any person,
except an alien, a minor, a person who has been adjudicated a youthful offender, as defined in
section fifty-two of chapter one hundred and nineteen, including those who have not received an
adult sentence or a person who has been convicted of a felony in any state or federal jurisdiction,
or of the unlawful use, possession or sale of narcotic or harmful drugs, to sell ammunition. Every
license shall specify the street and number, if any, of the building where the business is to be
carried on. The licensing authority to whom such application is made shall cause one copy of the
of 3

application to be forwarded to the commissioner of the department of criminal justice
information services, who shall within a reasonable time thereafter advise such authority in
writing of any criminal record disqualifying the applicant. The fee for an application for a license
to sell ammunition shall be $100, which shall be payable to the licensing authority and shall not
be prorated or refunded in case of revocation or denial. The licensing authority shall retain $25
of the fee; $50 of the fee shall be deposited into the general fund of the commonwealth; and $25
of the fee shall be deposited in the Firearms Fingerprint Identity Verification Trust Fund. The
licensing authority to whom such application is made shall cause one copy of any approved
application to be forwarded to the commissioner of the department of criminal justice
information services.
Any lawfully incorporated sporting or shooting club shall, upon application, be licensed
to sell or supply ammunition for regulated shooting on their premises, as for skeet, target or trap
shooting; provided, however, that such club license shall, in behalf of said club, be issued to and
exercised by an officer or duly authorized member of the club who himself possesses a firearm
identification card or a license to carry a firearm and who would not be disqualified to receive a
license to sell ammunition in his own right. The licensing authority may revoke or suspend a
license to sell ammunition for violation of any provision of this chapter.
The secretary of the executive office of public safety may establish such rules and
regulations as he may deem necessary to carry out the provisions of this section.
Any person refused a license under this section or once issued a license under this section
has had said license suspended or revoked may obtain a judicial review of such refusal,
suspension or revocation by filing within thirty days of such refusal, suspension or revocation a
of 3

petition for review thereof in the district court having jurisdiction in the city or town in which the
applicant filed for such license, and a justice of said court, after a hearing, may direct that a
license be issued the applicant if satisfied there was no reasonable ground for refusing such
license and that the applicant was not prohibited by law from holding the same.
Whoever not being licensed, as hereinbefore provided, sells ammunition within the
commonwealth shall be punished by a fine of not less than five hundred nor more than one
thousand dollars or by imprisonment for not less than six months nor more than two years.
SECTION 2. Section 3 of Chapter 135 of the Acts of 2024 is hereby repealed.
of 3